Washington statutes.
RCW 15.24.020

Commission created—Generally.

There is hereby created a Washington apple commission to be thus known and designated. The commission shall be composed of nine apple growers and four apple dealers. In addition, the director shall be a full voting member of the commission and may in his or her place appoint any other employee of the department of agriculture as a designee to attend commission meetings and otherwise represent the director and exercise the director's vote.

The nine grower members shall be citizens and residents of this state, over the age of twenty-five years, each of whom, either individually or as an executive officer of a corporation, firm or partnership, is and has been actually engaged in growing and producing apples within the state of Washington for a period of five years, currently operates a commercial producing orchard in the district represented, and has during that period derived a substantial portion of his or her income therefrom. The four dealer members shall be persons who, either individually or as executive officers of a corporation, firm, partnership, association, or cooperative organization, are and have been actively engaged as dealers in apples within the state of Washington for a period of five years, and are citizens and residents of this state, and are engaged as apple dealers in the district represented. The qualifications of members of the commission as herein set forth must continue during their term of office. A person who meets the qualifications of both a grower and a dealer as set forth in this section may serve as either a grower member or a dealer member.

[ 2016 sp.s. c 15 s 2; 2004 c 178 s 2; 2002 c 313 s 116; 1989 c 354 s 54; 1967 c 240 s 23; 1963 c 145 s 2; 1961 c 11 s 15.24.020. Prior: 1949 c 191 s 1, part; 1937 c 195 s 3, part; Rem. Supp. 1949 s 2874-3, part.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2002 c 313: See note following RCW 15.65.020.

Severability—1989 c 354: See note following RCW 15.36.012.